Wisconsin, session 2025, SB475.
do enact as follows:SB475,11Section 1. 101.02 (26) of the statutes is created to read:SB475,2,92101.02 (26) Chapters SPS 361 to 366, Wis. Adm. Code, in effect on August 1, 32025, apply to a public building, public structure, or place of employment and s. SPS 4361.03 (7), Wis. Adm. Code, does not apply to the public building, public structure, 5or place of employment if the plans of the public building, public structure, or place 6of employment are submitted to the department or, if the city, village, town, or 7county within which the public building, public structure, or place of employment is 8to be located is authorized to perform examinations under s. 101.12, that city, 9village, town, or county, no later than April 1, 2026.SB475,2,1010